Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB556.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 210.370 TO 210.485 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Child Mental Health Services Access Program is hereby
established. The purpose of the program shall be to help health care practitioners
in the Commonwealth meet the needs of a child with mental illness or a child
with an intellectual disability.
(2) The program shall be operated by each regional community services program for
mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability established pursuant to
KRS 210.370.
(3) The program shall at a minimum employ a psychiatrist licensed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 311 and a psychologist licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 319.
(4) The program shall operate a dedicated hotline phone number Monday through
Friday from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. local time that serves as the entry point to the
program for health care practitioners to be able to get services for a child with
mental illness or a child with an intellectual disability. Services may include:
(a) Immediate clinical consultation over the telephone;
(b) Expedited face-to-face mental health consultation;
(c) Care coordination for assistance with referrals to community behavioral
health services; and
(d) Continuing professional education specifically designed for health care
practitioners.
Section 2. KRS 210.400 is amended to read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of this section and the policies and regulations of the secretary
of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, each community board for mental health
or individuals with an intellectual disability shall:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1805
(1) Review and evaluate services for mental health or individuals with an intellectual
disability provided pursuant to KRS 210.370 to 210.460, and report thereon to the
secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the administrator of the
program, and, when indicated, the public, together with recommendations for
additional services and facilities;
(2) Recruit and promote local financial support for the program from private sources
such as community chests, business, industrial and private foundations, voluntary
agencies, and other lawful sources, and promote public support for municipal and
county appropriations;
(3) Promote, arrange, and implement working agreements with other social service
agencies, both public and private, and with other educational and judicial agencies;
(4) Adopt and implement policies to stimulate effective community relations;
(5) Be responsible for the development and approval of an annual plan and budget;
(6) Act as the administrative authority of the community program for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(7) Oversee and be responsible for the management of the community program for
mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability in accordance with the
plan and budget adopted by the board and the policies and regulations issued under
KRS 210.370 to 210.480 by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(8) Comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090;[ and]
(9) Deliver the training recommended by the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities for local jailers and other officers of the
court who may come in contact with persons deemed mentally ill and who are
incarcerated or in detention; and
(10) Be responsible for implementing, staffing, and operating the Kentucky Child
Mental Health Services Access Program established in Section 1 of this Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:52 PM Jacketed